Wisconsin, session 2025, AB414.
do enact as follows:AB414,11Section 1. 125.07 (5) (a) 1. and 2. of the statutes are amended to read:AB414,2,42125.07 (5) (a) 1. “Bystander” means a person who is present with a crime 3victim at the time of or immediately following the alleged crime or is a witness, as 4defined in s. 940.41 (3), to the alleged crime.AB414,2,652. “Crime victim” means a person who claims to have been the victim of a 6crime constituting.AB414,2,971m. “Crime” means a violation under s. 940.22 (2), 940.225, 940.302, 948.02 8(1) or (2), 948.025, or 948.05 to 948.095 or 944.06, or a crime under ch. 948 that 9involves sexual contact or sexually explicit conduct.AB414,210Section 2. 125.07 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB414,2,1511125.07 (5) (b) Subject to par. (c), an underage person may not be issued a 12citation for, or convicted of, a violation of sub. (4) (a) or (b), nor may an underage 13person’s pretrial release, probation, extended supervision, parole, or supervised 14release be revoked based on a violation of sub. (4) (a) or (b), if all of the following 15apply:AB414,3,2161. The underage person is a crime victim or bystander and either the crime 17victim or the bystander requested emergency assistance in connection with the 18alleged crime, by dialing the telephone number “911” or by other means, in 19connection with the alleged crime or the underage person encountered a law 20enforcement officer at a medical facility at which the crime victim received 1treatment in connection with the alleged crime, or the underage person sought to 2report or request assistance for a crime.AB414,3,1032. The underage person remains at the scene until emergency assistance 4arrives and thereafter cooperates with providers of emergency assistance, including 5furnishing any requested information, unless the underage person lacks capacity to 6cooperate when emergency medical assistance arrives. If the underage person 7encounters a law enforcement officer at a medical facility or while seeking to report 8or request assistance for a crime, the underage person cooperates with the officer 9and furnishes any requested information, unless the underage person lacks 10capacity to cooperate with the officer.AB414,311Section 3. 125.07 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB414,3,1512125.07 (5) (c) Paragraph (b) does not apply to an underage person who 13requests emergency assistance, by dialing the telephone number “911” or by other 14means, with an intention to claim the protections under par. (b) and knowing that 15the fact situation that he or she reports does not exist.AB414,416Section 4. 704.16 (1) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB414,3,2017704.16 (1) (b) 3. An injunction order under s. 813.125 (4) protecting the tenant 18or a child of the tenant from the another person, based on the other person’s 19engaging in an act that would constitute sexual assault under s. 940.225, 948.02, or 20948.025, or stalking under s. 940.32, or attempting or threatening to do the same.AB414,521Section 5. 704.16 (1) (b) 5. of the statutes is renumbered 704.16 (1m) (b).AB414,622Section 6. 704.16 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB414,4,223704.16 (1m) Terminating tenancy by tenant: sexual assault. A 24residential tenant may terminate his or her tenancy and remove from the premises 1if the tenant provides the landlord with notice in the manner provided under s. 2704.21 and with a certified copy of any of the following:AB414,4,63(a) An injunction order under s. 813.125 (4) protecting the tenant or a child of 4the tenant from another person, based on the other person’s engaging in an act that 5would constitute sexual assault under s. 940.225, 948.02, or 948.025, or attempting 6or threatening to do the same.AB414,77Section 7. 704.16 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB414,4,148704.16 (2m) Not liable for rent: sexual assault. If a residential tenant 9removes from the premises and provides the landlord with a certified copy specified 10under sub. (1m) and with notice that complies with s. 704.21, the tenant shall not be 11liable for any rent after the end of the month following the month in which he or she 12provides the notice or removes from the premises, whichever is later. The tenant’s 13liability for rent under this subsection is subject to the landlord’s duty to mitigate 14damages as provided in s. 704.29 (2).AB414,815Section 8. 939.74 (2) (ar) of the statutes is amended to read:AB414,4,1916939.74 (2) (ar) A prosecution for a violation of s. 940.225 (2) or may be 17commenced within 20 years after the commission of the violation. A prosecution for 18a violation of s. 940.225 (3) may be commenced within 10 years after the 19commission of the violation.AB414,920Section 9. 961.444 of the statutes is created to read:AB414,4,2421961.444 Person seeking assistance following sexual assault; 22immunity from prosecution. (1) Definition. In this section, “sexual assault” 23means conduct that is in violation of s. 940.22 (2), 940.225, 940.302, or 944.06 or a 24crime under ch. 948 that involves sexual contact or sexually explicit conduct.AB414,5,51(2) Immunity for aider. A person is immune from being charged or 2prosecuted under s. 961.573 for the possession of drug paraphernalia, under s. 3961.41 (3g) for the possession of a controlled substance or a controlled substance 4analog, and under s. 961.69 (2) for possession of a masking agent if all of the 5following apply:AB414,5,116(a) The person requested emergency assistance in connection with a sexual 7assault by calling the telephone number “911” or by other means, the person 8encountered a law enforcement officer at a medical facility at which the victim of 9the sexual assault received treatment in connection with the sexual assault, or the 10person sought to report the sexual assault or requested assistance for the sexual 11assault.AB414,5,1312(b) The evidence for the charge or prosecution is obtained as a result of the 13person’s action described under par. (a).AB414,5,1514(c) The person provides a name and contact information and furnishes any 15requested information unless the person lacks capacity to cooperate.AB414,5,2016(3) Immunity for victim. A victim of a sexual assault is immune from being 17charged or prosecuted under s. 961.573 for the possession of drug paraphernalia, 18under s. 961.41 (3g) for the possession of a controlled substance or a controlled 19substance analog, and under s. 961.69 (2) for possession of a masking agent if all of 20the following apply:AB414,5,2221(a) The victim sought to report the sexual assault or was in need of assistance 22due to the sexual assault.AB414,6,21(b) The evidence for the charge or prosecution was obtained as a result of the 2victim’s action described under par. (a).AB414,6,53(4) Prohibition on revocation. A person’s pretrial release, probation, 4extended supervision, parole, or supervised release may not be revoked based on an 5incident for which the person is immune from prosecution under sub. (2) or (3).AB414,106Section 10. Initial applicability.AB414,6,97(1) Notwithstanding s. 990.06, the treatment of s. 939.74 (2) (ar) first applies 8to an act for which the time limit under s. 939.74 (2) (ar), 2023 stats., for 9prosecution has not expired as of the effective date of this subsection.AB414,6,1010